Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.500

Printing and distribution of publications—Fees.

The department of labor and industries, to defray the costs of printing, reprinting, or distributing printed matter issued by the department of labor and industries including, but not limited to, the matters listed in RCW 43.22.505, may charge a fee for such publications in an amount which will reimburse the department for the costs of printing, reprinting, and distributing such publications: PROVIDED, That every person subject to regulation by the department may upon request receive without charge one copy per year of any publication printed pursuant to RCW 43.22.505 whenever such person is affected by any statute, rule or regulation printed therein. All fees collected shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the appropriate fund or account.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 67 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 123 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 67: See note following RCW 19.28.351.